Florida, session 2026, HB11.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 15.0352, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
15.0352 Official state birds.—
(1) The American flamingo (Phoenicopterus ruber) is
designated the official Florida state bird.
(2) The Florida scrub-jay (Aphelocoma coerulescens) is
designated the official Florida state songbird.
Section 2. The designation of the American flamingo as the
official Florida state bird and the Florida scrub-jay as the
official Florida state songbird by s. 15.0352, Florida Statutes,
supersedes the designation of the mockingbird as the official
Florida state bird by Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 3,
adopted during the 1927 Regular Session.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb11-00